District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.31

Severability.

Each section of this subchapter, and every provision of each section, is hereby declared to be an independent section or provision, and the holding of any section or provision of any section to be void, ineffective, or unconstitutional for any cause whatever shall not be deemed to affect any other section or provision thereof.

History

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1225, ch. 118, § 31

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 10-135.
1973 Ed., § 10-133.